Utah statutes.
31A-6b-302.   Required disclosures.
(1)  A guaranteed asset protection waiver shall disclose the information
described in Subsection (2):
(a)  in writing; and
(b)  in understandable language that is easy to read.
(2)  A guaranteed asset protection waiver shall disclose:
(a)  the name and address of the initial creditor and the borrower at the time
the guaranteed asset protection waiver is executed;
(b)  if there is an administrator for the guaranteed asset protection waiver:
(i)  the name of the administrator;
(ii)  the address of the administrator; and
(iii)  a toll-free number to contact the administrator;
(c)  the charge for the guaranteed asset protection waiver;
(d)  the terms of the guaranteed asset protection waiver, including:
(i)  the requirements for receiving the protection of the guaranteed asset
protection waiver;
(ii)  the conditions imposed by the guaranteed asset protection waiver; and
(iii)  the exclusions from the protection of the guaranteed asset protection
waiver;
(e)  the procedure the borrower must follow, if any, to obtain a benefit under
the guaranteed asset protection waiver, including a telephone number and
address where the borrower may apply for a benefit under the guaranteed asset
protection waiver;
(f)  that the borrower may cancel the guaranteed asset protection waiver;
(g)  the rights the borrower has to a refund under Section 31A-6b-303;
(h)  if the guaranteed asset protection waiver is cancelled or terminated
after the preliminary period:
(i)  the procedures for requesting a refund under Section 31A-6b-303,
including that the borrower request a refund in writing in accordance with
Section 31A-6b-303; and
(ii)  the methodology for calculating the refund due, if any;
(i)  that none of the following may be conditioned on the purchase of a
guaranteed asset protection waiver:
(i)  the extension of credit;
(ii)  a term of credit; or
(iii)  a term of the related vehicle sale or lease; and
(j) (i)  that a guaranteed asset protection waiver is subject to limited
regulation by the commissioner; and
(ii)  that a complaint regarding a guaranteed asset protection waiver may be
submitted to the commissioner.
